Maryland, session 2025, HB1186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–216.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ABORTION–INDUCING DRUG” MEANS A DRUG,
MEDICINE, OR A MEDICINAL OR CHEMICAL PREPARATION FOR INTERNAL HUMAN
CONSUMPTION THAT IS DESIGNED TO INDUCE AN ABORTION.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY AND WILLFULLY CAUSE ANOTHER TO
INGEST AN ABORTION–INDUCING DRUG:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1186*

HOUSE BILL 1186
(1) WHEN THE PERSON KNOWS OR BELIEVES THAT THE OTHER
PERSON IS PREGNANT; AND
(2) (I) WITHOUT CONSENT;
(II) THROUGH FRAUD OR COERCION; OR
(III) BY FORCE OR THREAT OF FORCE.
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND
ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 25 YEARS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.